apertium-nno.nno.dix
<pardef n="rik/je__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jande</l> <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>j</l>     <r>je</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jast</l>  <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jer</l>   <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e c="v:"> <p><l>ande</l>  <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
  <e c="v:"> <p><l></l>      <r>je</r></p><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e c="v:"> <p><l>ast</l>   <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
  <e c="v:"> <p><l>er</l>    <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rik/je_no-cp__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jande</l> <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>j</l><r>je</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_no-cp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jast</l>  <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jer</l>   <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>

  <e c="v:"> <p><l>ande</l>  <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
  <e c="v:"> <p><l></l>      <r>je</r></p><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e c="v:"> <p><l>ast</l>   <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
  <e c="v:"> <p><l>er</l>    <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="læk/je__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jande</l> <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>j</l><r>je</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jast</l>  <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jer</l>   <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tenk/e__vblex_adj" c="NPK prefers -j; lemma is without -j for simpler scandi bidix">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jande</l> <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>j</l>     <r>e</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jast</l>  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jer</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e c="v:"> <p><l>ande</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
  <e c="v:"> <p><l></l>      <r>e</r></p><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e c="v:"> <p><l>ast</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
  <e c="v:"> <p><l>er</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tenk/e_no-cp__vblex_adj" c="NPK prefers -j; lemma is without -j for simpler scandi bidix">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jande</l> <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>j</l>     <r>e</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_no-cp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jast</l>  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jer</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>

  <e c="v:"> <p><l>ande</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
  <e c="v:"> <p><l></l>      <r>e</r></p><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_no-cp"/></e>
  <e c="v:"> <p><l>ast</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
  <e c="v:"> <p><l>er</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="gjennomsøke">   <i>gjennomsøk</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="føyke">       <i>føyk</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="rike opp">      <i>rik</i><par n="tenk/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>opp</ig></e>
<e lm="speke">       <i>spek</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fortenke">    <i>fortenk</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="krøke">       <i>krøk</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="mistenke">    <i>mistenk</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ettersøke"><i>ettersøk</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="merkje seg">   <i>merk</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg</ig></e>
<e lm="sprike">      <i>sprik</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ønsketenke">       <par n="ø_y"/><i>nsketenk</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kveike">      <i>kveik</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="styrke">          <i>styrk</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="glattsleike"><i>glattsleik</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="svimerkje"><i>svimerk</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="særmerkje"><i>særmerk</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="øyremerkje"><i>øyremerk</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="øremerkje"><i>øremerk</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="brennemerkje"><i>brennemerk</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ommerkje"><i>ommerk</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="merkje om"><i>merk</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>om</ig></e>
<e lm="merkje av"><i>merk</i><par n="rik/je_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>av</ig></e>
<e lm="tenke høgt">          <i>tenk</i><par n="tenk/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>høgt</ig></e>
<e lm="tenke med seg sjølv">          <i>tenk</i><par n="tenk/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>med<b/>seg<b/>sjølv</ig></e>
<e lm="tenke ut">          <i>tenk</i><par n="tenk/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>ut</ig></e>
<e lm="tenke gjennom">          <i>tenk</i><par n="tenk/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>gjennom</ig></e>
<e lm="tenke over">          <i>tenk</i><par n="tenk/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>over</ig></e>
<e lm="tenke seg">          <i>tenk</i><par n="tenk/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg</ig></e>
<e lm="utmerkje seg"><i>utmerk</i><par n="rik/je_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg</ig></e>
<e lm="tenke ut">       <i>tenk</i><par n="tenk/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>ut</ig></e>
<e lm="søke ut">           <i>søk</i><par n="tenk/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>ut</ig></e>
<e lm="søke om">           <i>søk</i><par n="tenk/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>om</ig></e>
<e lm="søke gjennom">           <i>søk</i><par n="tenk/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>gjennom</ig></e>
<e lm="sermerke"><i>sermerk</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="halalmerkje"><i>halalmerk</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="blenke">    <i>blenk</i>   <par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="rike">      <i>rik</i>     <par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bøyke"><i>bøyk</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sevjeberke"><i>sevjeberk</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kyrke"><i>kyrk</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="miljømerkje"> <i>miljømerk</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="utmerkje">    <i>utmerk</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="heilsteikje"> <i>heilsteik</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="lækje">       <i>læk</i><par n="læk/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="dykje">       <i>dyk</i><par n="læk/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hækje">       <i>hæk</i><par n="læk/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="brekje">      <i>brek</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="rækje">       <i>ræk</i><par n="læk/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="snækje">      <i>snæk</i><par n="læk/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="verkje">      <i>verk</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="flækje">      <i>flæk</i><par n="læk/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kikje">       <i>kik</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="nækje">       <i>næk</i><par n="læk/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="røkje">       <i>røk</i><par n="læk/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fløkje">      <i>fløk</i><par n="læk/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="vikje">       <i>vik</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="veikje">      <i>veik</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kyrkje">      <i>kyrk</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="føykje">      <i>føyk</i><par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="avmerke">                <i>avmerk</i><par n="tenk/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="slindberkje">	<i>slindberk</i>	<par n="rik/je__vblex_adj"/> </e>
